Washington statutes.
RCW 42.40.100

Assertions against auditor.

A whistleblower wishing to provide information under this chapter regarding asserted improper governmental action against the state auditor or an employee of that office shall provide the information to the attorney general who shall act in place of the auditor in investigating and reporting the matter.

[ 1999 c 361 s 6.]